test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-28pundar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pundar: # Noun (28) pundar 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pundar+N+Sg+Nom: pundar
     pundar+N+Sg+Gen: puntra
     pundar+N+Sg+Par: pundard
     pundar+N+Sg+Ill: puntrahe
     pundar+N+Sg+Ine: puntran
     pundar+N+Sg+Ela: puntrast
     pundar+N+Sg+All: puntralõ
     pundar+N+Sg+Ade: puntral
     pundar+N+Sg+Abl: puntralt
     pundar+N+Sg+Tra: puntras
     pundar+N+Sg+Ter: puntraniq
     pundar+N+Sg+Abe: puntraldaq
     pundar+N+Sg+Com: puntragaq
     pundar+N+Pl+Nom: puntraq
     pundar+N+Pl+Gen: puntridõ
     pundar+N+Pl+Par: puntrit
     pundar+N+Pl+Ill: puntrihe
     pundar+N+Pl+Ine: puntrin
     pundar+N+Pl+Ela: puntrist
     pundar+N+Pl+All: puntrilõ
     pundar+N+Pl+Ade: puntril
     pundar+N+Pl+Abl: puntrilt
     pundar+N+Pl+Tra: puntris
     pundar+N+Pl+Ter: puntriniq
     pundar+N+Pl+Abe: puntrildaq
     pundar+N+Pl+Com: puntridõgaq
